src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! The possessive construction results in different case ordering:
!! 
!! ''N-Num-Poss-Case'':
!! 
!! * Genetive
!! * Ablative
!! * Dative
!! * Abessive
!! * Adverbial
!! * Approximative
!! * Terminative
!! 
!! ''N-Num-Case-Poss'':
!! 
!! * Inessive
!! * Elative
!! * Illative
!! * Egressive
!! * Prolative
!! * Instrumental
!! 
!! Note that since the adjective 'determinative' is essentially the 3rd person
!! singular possessive, the above ordering also follows for adjective inflection.
!! Also note, some cases have atlernate forms for when tehy come before the possessive.
!! 
!! Cases with alternate forms:
!! 
!! * Accusative singular, plural
!! * Inessive singular, plural
!! * Illative singular, plural
!! * Elative singular, plural
!! 
!! ''Examples'':
!! 
!! Genetive:
!! 
!! | Px 1pSg        | Px 2pSg         | Px 3pSg
!! | бакча-е-лэн    | бакча-ед-лэн    | бакча-ез-лэн
!! | бакча-ос-ы-лэн | бакча-ос-ыд-лэн | бакча-ос-ыз-лэн
!! 
!! Inessive:
!! 
!! | Px 1pSg      | Px 2pSg      | Px 3pSg
!! | бакча-я-м    | бакча-я-д    | бакча-я-з
!! | бакча-ос-а-м | бакча-ос-а-д | бакча-ос-а-з
!! 
!! Elative:
!! 
!! | Px 1pSg          | Px 2pSg          | Px 3pSg
!! | бакча-ысьты-м    | бакча-ысьты-д    | бакча-ысьты-з
!! | бакча-ос-ысьты-м | бакча-ос-ысьты-д | бакча-ос-ысьты-з
!! 
!! * TODO: write tests for these ordering situations
!! * TODO: implement these in lexc

!! !! Noun Lexica

LEXICON N_
!! Words from lexicon @LEXNAME@ are mostly covered. These are from the main
!! class of nouns described in more depth above.
! NOUNSUF ; !!  2014-01-24 __If they are not against us, they are for us__
! Testing Jaska
 NOUNSUF ;

LEXICON N_KORKA
!! this nouns, as well as коала, have special +N+Sg+Ine endings in "н" 
!! TODO: +N+Sg+Ine     endings	 in "н"
! Testing Jaska
 NOUNSUF ;

LEXICON N_RUS_JA
!! Words from Russian in ''@LEXNAME@'' end in –ия, our lexicon entries
!! set the stem as ending in –ия, but there is a trigger that causes
!! the final "я" to disappear in some situations.
! Testing Jaska
:я%^RusJa NOUNSUF ;

LEXICON N_RUS_JE
!! Words from Russian in ''@LEXNAME@'' end in –ие, our lexicon entries
!! set the stem as ending in –ие, but there is a trigger that causes
!! the final "е" to disappear in some situations.
! Testing Jaska
:е%^RusJa NOUNSUF ;


LEXICON CASESUF_KORKA
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' controls the output of case suffixes in the корка/куала type
!! which tends to take short case suffixes when they are available.
+Nom:%>0 K;
+Acc:%>ез K;
+Acc+Dial/North:%>ты K;
+Gen:%>лэн K;
+Abl:%>лэсь K;
+Dat:%>лы K;
+Ins:%>ен K;
+Abe:%>тэк K;
+Advl:%>я K;
+Ine:%>н K;
+Ill:%>е K;
+Ela:%>сь K;
+Egr:%>сен K;
+Ter:%>озь K;
+Prl:%>етӥ K;
+Apr:%>лань K;

LEXICON N_TAT
!! Words from Tatar in ''@LEXNAME@'' preserve the original stem я in all cases.
NOUNSUF ;

LEXICON N_СИН
+N:М3 NOUNSUF_01_V ;
+N: NOUNSUF_01_C ;

LEXICON N_НЮЛЭС
+N:К3 NOUNSUF_01_V ;
+N: NOUNSUF_01_C ;

LEXICON N_УРДЭС
+N:%^SYNC NOUNSUF_01_V ; !урдсын
+N:К3 NOUNSUF_01_V ; !урдэскын
+N: NOUNSUF_01_C ;

LEXICON N_СЮЛЭМ
+N:%^SYNC NOUNSUF_01_V ; !сюлмын
+N: NOUNSUF_01_V ; !сюлэмын
+N: NOUNSUF_01_C ;


!! À la Jaska
LEXICON NOUNSUF
+N: NOUNSUF_01 ;

LEXICON NOUNSUF_01
 NOUNSUF_01_C ;
 NOUNSUF_01_V ;

LEXICON NOUNSUF_01_C
+Sg: AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_C ;
+Pl:%>ъёс AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_C ;

LEXICON NOUNSUF_01_V
+Sg: AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V ;
+Pl:%>ъёс AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V ;
+Sg+Ter+PxPl1:%>озямы K ; !Sg
+Sg+Ter+PxPl2:%>озяды K ; ! Sg
+Sg+Ter+PxPl3:%>озязы K ; !Sg

LEXICON AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_C
+Nom:%> K;
+Acc+Dial/North:%>ты K;
+Gen:%>лэн K;
+Abl:%>лэсь K;
+Dat:%>лы K;
+Abe:%>тэк K;
+Advl:%>ъя K;
+Apr:%>лань K;
! with possession
+Nom+PxPl1:%>мы K ;
+Nom+PxPl2:%>ды K ;
+Nom+PxPl3:%>зы K ;

+Acc+PxSg1:%>ме K ;
+Acc+PxSg2:%>тэ K ;
+Acc+PxSg3:%>сэ K ;
+Acc+PxPl1:%>мес K ;
+Acc+PxPl2:%>тэс K ;
+Acc+PxPl3:%>сэс K ;

+Gen+PxPl1:%>мылэн K ;
+Gen+PxPl2:%>тылэн K ;
+Gen+PxPl3:%>сылэн K ;

+Abl+PxPl1:%>мылэсь K ;
+Abl+PxPl2:%>тылэсь K ;
+Abl+PxPl3:%>сылэсь K ;

+Dat+PxPl1:%>мылы K ;
+Dat+PxPl2:%>тылы K ;
+Dat+PxPl3:%>сылы K ;

+Abe+PxPl1:%>мытэк K ;
+Abe+PxPl2:%>тытэк K ;
+Abe+PxPl3:%>сытэк K ;

+Advl+PxPl1:%>мыя K ;
+Advl+PxPl2:%>тыя K ;
+Advl+PxPl3:%>сыя K ;

+Ter+PxPl1:%>мыозь K ;
+Ter+PxPl2:%>тыозь K ;
+Ter+PxPl3:%>сыозь K ;

+Apr+PxPl1:%>мылань K ;
+Apr+PxPl2:%>тылань K ;
+Apr+PxPl3:%>сылань K ;

LEXICON AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V
+Acc:%>Е3з K;
+Ins:%>эн K;
+Ine:%>ын K;
+Ill:%>Е3 K;
+Ela:%>ысь K;
+Egr:%>ысен K;
+Ter:%>озь K;
+Prl:%>этӥ K;

! with possession
+Nom+PxSg1:%>Е3 K ;
+Nom+PxSg2:%>Е3д K ;
+Nom+PxSg3:%>Е3з K ;

+Gen+PxSg1:%>Е3лэн K ;
+Gen+PxSg2:%>Е3длэн K ;
+Gen+PxSg3:%>Е3злэн K ;

+Abl+PxSg1:%>Е3лэсь K ;
+Abl+PxSg2:%>Е3длэсь K ;
+Abl+PxSg3:%>Е3злэсь K ;

+Dat+PxSg1:%>Е3лы K ;
+Dat+PxSg2:%>Е3длы K ;
+Dat+PxSg3:%>Е3злы K ;

+Ins+PxSg1:%>Е3ным K ;
+Ins+PxSg2:%>Е3ныд K ;
+Ins+PxSg3:%>Е3ныз K ;
+Ins+PxPl1:%>Е3нымы K ;
+Ins+PxPl2:%>Е3ныды K ;
+Ins+PxPl3:%>Е3нызы K ;

+Abe+PxSg1:%>Е3тэк K ;
+Abe+PxSg2:%>Е3дтэк K ;
+Abe+PxSg3:%>Е3зтэк K ;

+Advl+PxSg1:%>Е3я K ;
+Advl+PxSg2:%>Е3дъя K ;
+Advl+PxSg3:%>Е3зъя K ;

+Ine+PxSg1:%>А3м K ;
+Ine+PxSg2:%>А3д K ;
+Ine+PxSg3:%>А3з K ;
+Ine+PxPl1:%>А3мы K ;
+Ine+PxPl2:%>А3ды K ;
+Ine+PxPl3:%>А3зы K ;

+Ill+PxSg1:%>А3м K ;
+Ill+PxSg2:%>А3д K ;
+Ill+PxSg3:%>А3з K ;
+Ill+PxPl1:%>А3мы K ;
+Ill+PxPl2:%>А3ды K ;
+Ill+PxPl3:%>А3зы K ;

+Ela+PxSg1:%>ысьтым K ;
+Ela+PxSg2:%>ысьтыд K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:%>ысьтыз K ;
+Ela+PxPl1:%>ысьтымы K ;
+Ela+PxPl2:%>ысьтыды K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:%>ысьтызы K ;

+Ela+PxSg1:%>ысеным K ;
+Ela+PxSg2:%>ысеныд K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:%>ысеныз K ;
+Ela+PxPl1:%>ысенымы K ;
+Ela+PxPl2:%>ысеныды K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:%>ысенызы K ;

+Ter+PxSg1:%>озям K ;
+Ter+PxSg2:%>озяд K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:%>озяз K ;

+Prl+PxSg1:%>Е3тӥм K ;
+Prl+PxSg2:%>Е3тӥд K ;
+Prl+PxSg3:%>Е3тӥз K ;
+Prl+PxPl1:%>Е3тӥмы K ;
+Prl+PxPl2:%>Е3тӥды K ;
+Prl+PxPl3:%>Е3тӥзы K ;

+Apr+PxSg1:%>Е3лань K ;
+Apr+PxSg2:%>Е3длань K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:%>Е3злань K ;



LEXICON PREPX
+PxSg1: POSTCX;
+PxSg2:%>д POSTCX;
+PxSg3:%>з POSTCX;
+PxPl1:%>мы POSTCX;
+PxPl2:%>ды POSTCX;
+PxPl3:%>зы POSTCX;

LEXICON POSTCX
+Acc:%>Е3 K;
+Acc+Dial/North:%>ты K;
+Gen:%>ляэн K;
+Abl:%>лэсь K;
+Dat:%>лы K;
+Abe:%>тэк K;
+Advl:%>ъя K;
+Apr:%>лань K;
+Prl:%>озь K;

LEXICON POSTPX
+Nom:%>Е3 CXPXSG ;
+Nom:%> CXPXPL ; ! also for other cases?
+Ins:%>ены CXPX ;
+Ine:%>а CXPX ;
+Ill:%>а CXPX ;
+Ela:%>ысьти CXPX ;
+Egr:%>ысьены CXPX ;
+Tra:%>ети CXPX ;
+Ter:%>озьа CXPX ;

LEXICON CXPX
CXPXSG ;
CXPXPL ;

LEXICON CXPXSG
+PxSg1: K;
+PxSg2:%>д K;
+PxSg3:%>з K;

LEXICON CXPXPL
+PxPl1:%>мы K;
+PxPl2:%>ды K;
+PxPl3:%>зы K;

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER
    PROP_ ;
:%: PROP_ ;
:%- PROP_ ;
:%' PROP_ ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
