src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
азистория:азистори N_RUS_JA  "" ;
армия:арми N_RUS_JA  "" ;
бабылон:бабылон N_  "" ;
беризь% нюлэс:беризь% нюлэс N_НЮЛЭС  "" ;
биогеография:биогеографи N_RUS_JA  "" ;
бурмытӥсь:бурмытӥсь N_  "" ;
вал% люктан% вадес:вал% люктан% вадес N_УРДЭС  "" ;
визь% пыры:визь% пыры N_  "" ;
воспитание:воспитани N_RUS_JE  "" ;
вупыдэс:ву#пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
вусин:вусин N_СИН  "" ;
вылепырон:вылепырон N_  "" ;
вылэнергия:вылэнерги N_RUS_JA  "" ;
вӧлскымтэ% приложение:вӧлскымтэ% приложени N_RUS_JE  "" ;
гидрология:гидрологи N_RUS_JA  "" ;
горд% сэрег:горд% сэрег N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
гордсин:гордсин N_СИН  "" ;
гугама% уксё:гугама% уксё N_  "" ;
гур% пыдэс:гур% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
гур% урдэс:гур% урдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
гӧгӧрсин:гӧгӧрсин N_СИН  "" ;
дарысин:дарысин N_СИН  "" ;
деепричастие:деепричасти N_RUS_JE  "" ;
декорация:декораци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
дирекци% сэрег:дирекци% сэрег N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
дискуссия:дискусси N_RUS_JA  "" ;
долкам% син:долкам% син N_СИН  "" ;
долӟем% син:долӟем% син N_СИН  "" ;
дурсы% пыдэс:дурсы% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
дыдыксин:дыдыксин N_СИН  "" ;
дэра% гуӵат:дэра% гуӵат N_  "" ;
завещание:завещани N_RUS_JE  "" ;
замыкание:замыкани N_RUS_JE  "" ;
иждивение:иждивени N_RUS_JE  "" ;
имение:имени N_RUS_JE  "" ;
именинник:именинник N_  "" ;
индустрия:индустри N_RUS_JA  "" ;
йырпыдэс:йыр#пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
йырси:йырси N_  "" ;
йӧлюкен% герӟаськем% эрозия:йӧлюкен% герӟаськем% эрози N_RUS_JA  "" ;
кабан% пыдэс:кабан% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
кам% пыдэс:кам% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
кар% капка:кар% капка N_  "" ;
квитанция:квитанци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
кесмек% пыдэс:кесмек% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
кеч% син:кеч% син N_СИН  "" ;
кипыдэс:ки#пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
кия:кия N_TAT  "" ;
кобальт:кобальт N_  "" ;
кобы% пыдэс:кобы% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
компенсация:компенсаци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
конференция:конференци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
корка:корка N_KORKA  "talo" ;
корка% сэрег:корка% сэрег N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
косвенной% дополнение:косвенной% дополнени N_RUS_JE  "" ;
косой% син:косой% син N_СИН  "" ;
куакасин:куакасин N_СИН  "" ;
куала:куала N_KORKA  "rukouskota" ;
кубыста:кубыста N_  "" ;
кудӟем% нюлэс:кудӟем% нюлэс N_НЮЛЭС  "" ;
курегсин:курегсин N_СИН  "" ;
кыз% нюлэс:кыз% нюлэс N_НЮЛЭС  "" ;
кызо% нюлэс:кызо% нюлэс N_НЮЛЭС  "" ;
кылдысин:кылдысин N_СИН  "" ;
кылзытон:кылзытон N_  "" ;
кырымпыдэс:кырым#пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
кӧтпыдэс:кӧт#пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
лесомелиорация:лесомелиораци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
лимон:лимон N_  "" ;
лудкечсин:лудкечсин N_СИН  "" ;
лул% сюлэм:лул% сюлэм N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
лымшырвадес:лымшырвадес N_УРДЭС  "" ;
маялӟон:маялӟон N_  "" ;
мелиорация:мелиораци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
местоимение:местоимени N_RUS_JE  "" ;
монархия:монархи N_RUS_JA  "" ;
музъем% шорсюлэм:музъем% шорсюлэм N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
мята:мята N_  "" ;
мӧзмем% сюлэм:мӧзмем% сюлэм N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
наказание:наказани N_RUS_JE  "" ;
наставление:наставлени N_RUS_JE  "" ;
нюлэс:нюлэс N_НЮЛЭС  "" ;
нӧзь% сюлэм:нӧзь% сюлэм N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
обложение:обложени N_RUS_JE  "" ;
образование:образовани N_RUS_JE  "" ;
объявление:объявлени N_RUS_JE  "" ;
огазе% кариськон:огазе% кариськон N_  "" ;
океан% улпыдэс:океан% ул#пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
оккупация:оккупаци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
оправдание:оправдани N_RUS_JE  "" ;
осложнение:осложнени N_RUS_JE  "" ;
отрицание:отрицани N_RUS_JE  "" ;
ош% син:ош% син N_СИН  "" ;
палсин:палсин N_СИН  "" ;
парторганизация:парторганизаци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
перепеч:перепеч N_  "" ;
пиала% син:пиала% син N_СИН  "" ;
пие:пи N_RUS_JE  "" ;
писпу% сюлэм:писпу% сюлэм N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
подчинение:подчинени N_RUS_JE  "" ;
политэкономия:политэкономи N_RUS_JA  "" ;
полушарие:полушари N_RUS_JE  "" ;
предприятие:предприяти N_RUS_JE  "" ;
прописать% карон:прописать% карон N_  "" ;
просвещение:просвещени N_RUS_JE  "" ;
процессия:процесси N_RUS_JA  "" ;
пу% сюлэм:пу% сюлэм N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
пунысин:пунысин N_СИН  "" ;
пурты% пыдэс:пурты% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
пыдпыдэс:пыд#пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
пыдэс:пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
пӧсь% ошмессин:пӧсь% ошмессин N_СИН  "" ;
равновесилэн% яланлыдэз:равновесилэн% яланлыдэз N_  "" ;
расписание:расписани N_RUS_JE  "" ;
реакция:реакци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
репетиция:репетици N_RUS_JA  "" ;
сандык% пыдэс:сандык% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
сапег% пыдэс:сапег% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
сессия:сесси N_RUS_JA  "" ;
сильтӧл% син:сильтӧл% син N_СИН  "" ;
сиськылон:сиськылон N_  "" ;
событие:событи N_RUS_JE  "" ;
сублимация:сублимаци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
сьӧд% нюлэс:сьӧд% нюлэс N_НЮЛЭС  "" ;
сэрег:сэрег N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
сюдон% пыдэс:сюдон% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
сюлэм:сюлэм N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
сюмык% пыдэс:сюмык% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
сяласин:сяласин N_СИН  "" ;
сӥен-сӥен% буян:сӥен-сӥен% буян N_  "" ;
такасин:такасин N_СИН  "" ;
торфопредприятие:торфопредприяти N_RUS_JE  "" ;
транскрипция:транскрипци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
тушмон% син:тушмон% син N_СИН  "" ;
ты:ты N_  "" ;
тыпы% нюлэс:тыпы% нюлэс N_НЮЛЭС  "" ;
тыпыо% нюлэс:тыпыо% нюлэс N_НЮЛЭС  "" ;
тӧр% сэрег:тӧр% сэрег N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
укно% син:укно% син N_СИН  "" ;
умойскытон:умойскытон N_  "" ;
урдэс:урдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
функция:функци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
чагыр% син:чагыр% син N_СИН  "" ;
черкес:черкес N_  "" ;
черчение:черчени N_RUS_JE  "" ;
чия:чия N_TAT  "" ;
шляпа% пыдэс:шляпа% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
шоголпи:шоголпи N_  "" ;
шорсюлэм:шорсюлэм N_СЮЛЭМ  "" ;
шумес% пыдэс:шумес% пыдэс N_УРДЭС  "" ;
экватор% нюлэс:экватор% нюлэс N_НЮЛЭС  "" ;
экваторысь% нюлэс:экваторысь% нюлэс N_НЮЛЭС  "" ;
эквилибристика:эквилибристика N_  "" ;
эмиграция:эмиграци N_RUS_JA  "" ;
ӝогатӥськон:ӝогатӥськон N_  "" ;
ӝуась% син:ӝуась% син N_СИН  "" ;
